District of Columbia statutes.
20-108

Appointment of guardian ad litem.

If it appears to the Court that there is an apparent conflict between an interested person under a legal disability and a person described in section 20-101(d)(2)(A) , the Court may, in its discretion, appoint a guardian ad litem for the person with a legal disability.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 34(a), 53 DCR 6198

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-108.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “person with a legal disability” for “legally disabled person”.